District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1605

Sale of real estate under court decree.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 18, 1929, 45 Stat. 1226, ch. 259, § 2
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 582, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 161(h)(2)
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(v)(2), 48 DCR 334

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1605.
1973 Ed., § 47-1305.

Editor's Notes

Section 410(e) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(b), (d), (f), (l), (n), (o), (r), (v), (x)through (aa), (cc), (ff), (gg), (ll), (pp), (vv), (ww), (aaa), (ccc), (eee), and (ggg) shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”